Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.110

Identifying information of youth.

Subject to the rules of discovery, the office of public defense is authorized to collect identifying information for any youth who speaks with a consulting attorney pursuant to RCW 13.40.740; provided, however, that such records are exempt from public disclosure.

[ 2021 c 328 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 328: See note following RCW 13.40.740.